District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “HIV In-home Test Tax Exemption Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 47-2005 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by adding
a new paragraph (41) to read as follows:
“(41) Sales of human immunodeficiency virus (“HIV”) in-home tests.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
(a) Section 3 of this act shall take effect subject to the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an
approved budget and financial plan.

(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
of the certification.
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of this act.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (12 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto
by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code§ l-206.02(c)(l)), and publication in the
District of Columbia Register.